Missouri, session 2026, HB2887.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 167.207, to read as follows:
167.207. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Healthy Schools Act".
2. For the purposes of this section, "ultraprocessed food" means a food or
beverage that contains one or more of the following ingredients:
(1) Potassium bromate;
(2) Propylparaben;
(3) Titanium dioxide;
(4) Brominated vegetable oil;
(5) Yellow dye 5;
(6) Yellow dye 6;
(7) Blue dye 1;
(8) Blue dye 2;
(9) Green dye 3;
(10) Red dye 3;
(11) Red dye 40.
3. Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year and for all subsequent school years,
any school that participates in a federally funded or assisted meal program shall not
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2887 2
serve, sell, or allow a third party to sell ultraprocessed food on the school campus during
the school day. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a student's parent or
guardian from providing ultraprocessed food to the student during the school day.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall post on the
department's website both of the following:
(1) A standardized form that a public school may use to certify that the public
school is complying with the requirements of this section; and
(2) A list of each public school that has certified to the department that the
public school is complying with the requirements of this section.
✔